District of Columbia statutes.
38-771.06

Rulemaking.

(a)

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], shall issue rules to implement this chapter.

(b)

The proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council for a 45-day period of review. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, by resolution, within the 45- day review period, the proposed rules shall be deemed approved.

History

Oct. 17, 2013, D.C. Law 20-27, § 106, 60 DCR 11120

Section References

This section is referenced in § 38-771.05 and § 38-771.07.